src-fst-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
# Adjective inflection

## Temporary lexicon

* **LEXICON A_** = , when we do not know. Redirecting to N_ (?) 

## Regolar lexica

* **LEXICON A_UZ** = uz’:ud, goes to NMN_NORUZ

* **LEXICON A_RUSKED** = gets +A and goes to NMN\_RUSKED

**LEXICON A_MUNA**   muna:mun

* **LEXICON A_NADO** =  nado:nado

* **LEXICON A_POIG** =  poig:poig

* **LEXICON A_MARJ** =  marj:marj

* **LEXICON A_JAUH** =  jauh:jauh

* **LEXICON A_OIGED** = oiged:oig%{eØ%}d

* **LEXICON A_KEL** = kel':kel

* **LEXICON A_SAR1** = sar':sar

* **LEXICON A_KEZI** = kezi:ked

* **LEXICON A_VIDENZ1** =  videnz':viden (-den, -t, -zid)

* **LEXICON A_LANDEH** =  landeh:land

* **LEXICON A_VEDEKAZ** =  vedekaz:vedeka

* **LEXICON A_SEIBAZ** =  seibaz:seib

* **LEXICON A_CIPUINE** = cipuine:cipu

* **LEXICON A_TOSHTMINE** =  toštmine:toštmi

* **LEXICON A_KENGATOI** =  kengätoi:kengäto

* **LEXICON PRFPRC-DECLENSION** =  -nu

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vep/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>

---
